test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-4-nakatîw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - nakatîw :

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kinakatitin # I leave you, I leave you behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: ninakatâw # I leave him/her, I leave him/her behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kinakasin # you leave me, you leave me behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kinakatâw # you leave him/her, you leave him/her behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: nakatîw # he/she leaves another/others, he/she leaves another/others behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [nakatikow, nakatik] # another/others leave him/her, another/others leave him/her behind

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-nakatitân # as I leave you, as I leave you behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-nakatak # as I leave him/her, as I leave him/her behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-nakasiyan # as you leave me, as you leave me behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-nakatat # as you leave him/her, as you leave him/her behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-nakatât # as he/she leaves another/others, as he/she leaves another/others behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-nakatikot # as another/others leave him/her, as another/others leave him/her behind

      # Imp
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: nakasin # (you) leave me now, (you) leave me behind now
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: nakas # (you) leave him/her now, (you) leave him/her behind now
      

      # Prs # Ind

      # 1Sg
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kinakatitin # I leave you, I leave you behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: ninakatâw # I leave him/her, I leave him/her behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kinakatitinâwâw # I leave you all, I leave you all behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: ninakatâwak # I leave them, I leave them behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ninakatimâwa # I leave another/others, I leave another/others behind

      # 2Sg
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kinakasin # you leave me, you leave me behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kinakatâw # you leave him/her, you leave him/her behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kinakasinân # you leave us, you leave us behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kinakatâwak # you leave them, you leave them behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kinakatimâwa # you leave another/others, you leave another/others behind

      # 3Sg
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kinakasin # you leave me, you leave me behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kinakatik # he/she leaves you, he/she leaves you behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kinakasinân # you leave us, you leave us behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kinakatikonaw # he/she leaves you and us, he/she leaves you and us behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kinakatikowâw # he/she leaves you all, he/she leaves you all behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kinakatâwak # you leave them, you leave them behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kinakatimâwa # you leave another/others, you leave another/others behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: nakatimîw # he/she leaves yet another/others, he/she leaves yet another/others behind

      # 1Pl
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kinakatitinân # we leave you, we leave you behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: ninakatânân # we leave him/her, we leave him/her behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kinakatitinân # we leave you all, we leave you all behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: ninakatânânak # we leave them, we leave them behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ninakatimânâna # we leave another/others, we leave another/others behind

      # 12Pl
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kinakatânaw # we and you leave him/her, we and you leave him/her behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kinakatânawak # we and you leave them, we and you leave them behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kinakatimânawa # we and you leave another/others, we and you leave another/others behind

      # 2Pl
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kinakasinâwâw # you all leave me, you all leave me behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kinakatâwâw # you all leave him/her, you all leave him/her behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kinakasinân # you all leave us, you all leave us behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kinakatâwâwak # you all leave them, you all leave them behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kinakatimâwâwa # you all leave another/others, you all leave another/others behind

      # 3Pl
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: ninakatikwak # they leave me, they leave me behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: kinakatikwak # they leave you, they leave you behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: ninakatikonânak # they leave us, they leave us behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kinakatikonawak # they leave you and us, they leave you and us behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kinakatikowâwak # they leave you all, they leave you all behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: nakatîwak # they leave another/others, they leave another/others behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: nakatimîwak # they leave yet another/others, they leave yet another/others behind

      # 4Sg/Pl
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: ninakatikothiwa # another/others leave me, another/others leave me behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kinakatikothiwa # another/others leave you, another/others leave you behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [nakatikow, nakatik] # another/others leave him/her, another/others leave him/her behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: ninakatikonâna # another/others leave us, another/others leave us behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kinakatikonawa # another/others leave you and us, another/others leave you and us behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kinakatikowâwa # another/others leave you all, another/others leave you all behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [nakatikowak, nakatikwak] # another/others leave them, another/others leave them behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: nakatîthiwa # another/others leave yet another/others, another/others leave yet another/others behind

      # 5Sg/Pl
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: nakatikothiwa # yet another/others leave another/others, yet another/others leave another/others behind

      # X
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: ninakatikawin # someone leaves me, someone leaves me behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kinakatikawin # someone leaves you, someone leaves you behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: nakatâw # someone leaves him/her, someone leaves him/her behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: ninakatikawinân # someone leaves us, someone leaves us behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kinakatikawinaw, kinakatikawinânaw] # someone leaves you and us, someone leaves you and us behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kinakatikawinâwâw # someone leaves you all, someone leaves you all behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: nakatâwak # someone leaves them, someone leaves them behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: nakatâthiwa # someone leaves another/others, someone leaves another/others behind

      # 0Sg/Pl
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: ninakatikon
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: kinakatikon
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: nakatikow
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: ninakatikonân
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: kinakatikonaw
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: kinakatikowâw
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: nakatikowak
      nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: nakatikothiwa
      

      # Prs # Cnj

      # 1Sg
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-nakatitân # as I leave you, as I leave you behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-nakatak # as I leave him/her, as I leave him/her behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: î-nakatitakwâw # as I leave you all, as I leave you all behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: î-nakatakwâw # as I leave them, as I leave them behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: î-nakataki # as I leave them, as I leave them behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-nakatimak # as I leave another/others, as I leave another/others behind

      # 2Sg
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-nakasiyan # as you leave me, as you leave me behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-nakatat # as you leave him/her, as you leave him/her behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-nakasiyâhk # as you leave us, as you leave us behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-nakatacik # as you leave them, as you leave them behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-nakatimat # as you leave another/others, as you leave another/others behind

      # 3Sg
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-nakasiyan # as you leave me, as you leave me behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: î-nakatisk # as he/she leaves you, as he/she leaves you behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-nakasiyâhk # as you leave us, as you leave us behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: î-nakatikoyâhk # as you leave us, as you leave us behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: î-nakasiyamiht # as you leave us, as you leave us behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: î-nakatikoyahk # as he/she leaves you and us, as he/she leaves you and us behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: î-nakatitahk # as he/she leaves you and us, as he/she leaves you and us behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: î-nakatikoyîk # as he/she leaves you all, as he/she leaves you all behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: î-nakatitîk # as he/she leaves you all, as he/she leaves you all behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-nakatacik # as you leave them, as you leave them behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-nakatimat # as you leave another/others, as you leave another/others behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: î-nakatimât # as he/she leaves yet another/others, as he/she leaves yet another/others behind

      # 1Pl
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: î-nakatitâhk # as we leave you, as we leave you behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: î-nakatâyâhk # as we leave him/her, as we leave him/her behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-nakatakiht # as we leave him/her, as we leave him/her behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: î-nakatitâhk # as we leave you all, as we leave you all behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: î-nakatâyâhkwâw # as we leave them, as we leave them behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-nakatakihcik # as we leave them, as we leave them behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-nakatimâyâhk # as we leave another/others, as we leave another/others behind

      # 12Pl
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: î-nakatâyahk # as we and you leave him/her, as we and you leave him/her behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-nakatahk # as we and you leave him/her, as we and you leave him/her behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: î-nakatâyahkwâw # as we and you leave them, as we and you leave them behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-nakatahkwâw # as we and you leave them, as we and you leave them behind
      PV/î+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-nakatimâyahk # as we and you leave another/others, as we and you leave another/others behind
